North Dakota statutes. TITLE 6 Banks and Banking
CHAPTER 6-03 Powers, Management, and Operation of Banks
6-03-23.
Capital stock may be increased.

Any association may provide, either by its articles of incorporation, by subsequent resolution, or by written agreement of the holders of a majority of its stock, for an increase in its capital stock from time to time subject to the limitations of this title. No increase in capital stock is valid until the whole amount has been paid in, in cash, and such payment certified under oath by the president or cashier of the association to the secretary of state, nor until the secretary of state executes a certificate specifying that this chapter has been complied with, the amount of the increase in capital stock, and that the increase has been paid in as part of the capital of the association, nor until a copy of such certificate has been filed with the state banking board.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 11; 1893, ch. 27, § 11; R.C. 1895, § 3236; R.C. 1899, § 3236; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 12; R.C. 1905, § 4646; C.L. 1913, § 5161; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 20, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 6-0323; S.L. 1981, ch. 110, § 2.

Cross-References.

Securities of state or national bank exempt from regulation of issuance and sale of securities, see § 10-04-05, subs. 2.

6-03-24.
Capital stock may be reduced.

Any association may reduce its capital stock to any sum not less than the amount required to authorize the formation of any association by vote of its shareholders owning two-thirds of its stock. No such reduction may be made, however, until the amount thereof proposed is reported to the state banking board and its approval in writing obtained. No such reduction may affect the liability of shareholders for any debts of the association incurred prior to the reduction, and every such reduction must be certified to and a copy of the certificate filed in the same manner as for an increase of capital stock before it becomes valid.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 11; 1893, ch. 27, § 11; R.C. 1895, § 3236; R.C. 1899, § 3236; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 12; R.C. 1905, § 4646; C.L. 1913, § 5161; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 20, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 6-0324.

Collateral References.

Reduction of capital stock and distribution of capital assets, 35 A.L.R.2d 1149.

6-03-25.
Approval of increase or reduction by stockholders — Notice of stockholders’ meeting.

An increase or reduction of the capital stock of any association is not valid unless approved by the stockholders of the association at a meeting called for that purpose. Notice of the time and place of the meeting stating its object and the amount to which it is proposed to increase or reduce the capital stock of the association must be served personally or by registered or by certified mail on each stockholder of the association at least thirty days prior to the time set for such meeting. The notice must be given to stockholders whose places of residence are unknown or who are not residents of this state by publication of the notice at least once prior to the meeting in a legal newspaper of the county in which the principal office of the association is situated. A vote in favor of an increase in capital stock is not effective until the proceedings of the meeting showing the names of all of the stockholders voting for the increase and the amount of stock owned by each have been entered upon the records of the association.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 20, subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 6-0325; S.L. 1965, ch. 85, § 4.

6-03-26.
Meeting not required when all stockholders agree in writing to increase or reduction.

If all the stockholders of an association agree in writing to an increase or reduction in its capital stock, no meeting need be called for the purpose of effecting the increase or reduction. The directors shall file such written agreement, together with the certificate required under sections 6-03-23 and 6-03-24, with the secretary of state, who thereupon shall issue the secretary of state’s certificate that the provisions of this title have been complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 20, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 6-0326.

6-03-27.
List of shareholders to be kept and filed.

The president of every banking institution formed pursuant to the provisions of this title, at all times, shall keep a true and correct list of the names and post-office addresses of all shareholders of such banking institution, with the amount of stock held by each, the date of transfer, and to whom transferred, which list shall be verified on the thirty-first day of December of each year. A copy of the verified list shall be filed in the office of the commissioner on the same date.

The commissioner may request at least annually a list of all shareholders of a bank holding company controlling a state-chartered banking institution.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 36; R.C. 1905, § 4670; C.L. 1913, § 5185; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 25; 1943, ch. 88, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0327; S.L. 1979, ch. 125, § 1; 1985, ch. 120, § 1; 1997, ch. 79, § 6; 2013, ch. 77, § 16.

6-03-28.
Shares — Value and transfer — Shareholder’s obligation.

The capital stock of each association must be divided into shares of not less than ten dollars each and is deemed personal property and transferable on the books of the association in such manner as may be prescribed by its bylaws or articles of incorporation. A transfer of shares is not valid except between the parties to the transfer until the transfer is entered upon the books of the association and is not valid against the association or any creditor of the association while the registered holder of the shares is indebted to the bank as principal debtor, surety, guarantor, or otherwise. No dividend, interest, or profit may be paid on any stock of the bank or bank holding company as long as any past-due liability of the shareholder continues, but such dividend, interest, or profit must be retained by the association and applied to the discharge of the past-due liability. Every person or corporation becoming a shareholder by any transfer shall succeed, in proportion to the shares acquired by that shareholder, to all rights and liabilities of prior holders of the shares existing by reason of ownership of the shares and no change may be made in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the association by which the rights, remedies, or security of its existing creditors shall be impaired.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 10; 1893, ch. 27, § 10; R.C. 1895, § 3235; R.C. 1899, § 3235; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 11; R.C. 1905, § 4645; C.L. 1913, § 5160; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 21; R.C. 1943, § 6-0328; S.L. 1957, ch. 98, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 6-0328; S.L. 1971, ch. 105, § 1; 1991, ch. 81, § 4.

6-03-29.
Responsibility of shareholders — Double liability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1953, ch. 96, § 3.

6-03-29.1.
Responsibility of shareholders. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

6-03-30.
Shareholder’s liability — Limitation — Publication of notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

6-03-31.
Delinquent stock — Sale — Notice.

Whenever any shareholder or shareholder’s assignee fails to pay any assessment of the stock when the assessment is required to be paid, the board of directors of the association may sell at public or private sale, whichever appears to it best for all concerned, so much of the stock, at the best price obtainable, as is necessary to pay the assessment and costs of the sale. The sale must be made on a day certain to be fixed by the board not less than thirty days after the day set for the payment of the assessment. Notice of the time and place of the sale must be given to the shareholder in the manner following:

In the event of a private sale, by forwarding the notice to the person or persons in whose name the stock stands on the books of the association, at least twenty days prior to the date fixed for the sale, by registered or certified mail addressed to the shareholder’s address last known to the board of directors.

In the event of a public sale, by one publication of a notice thereof, at least twenty days prior to the date fixed for such sale, in a newspaper published in the county wherein the association is located.

A sale of stock as herein provided effects an absolute cancellation of the outstanding certificate or certificates in the hands of the delinquent shareholder, or the delinquent shareholder’s assignee or pledgee, and a new certificate must be issued by the association and delivered to the purchaser for the number of shares purchased, and a new certificate for the remaining shares, if any, must be issued to the shareholder and delivered to the shareholder, or the shareholder’s assignee, or pledgee, upon the surrender of the original certificate or certificates involved. Any proceeds of such sale remaining after the delinquent assessment and the expenses of the sale have been fully paid must be paid over to the shareholder, or the shareholder’s assignee or pledgee.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 9; 1893, ch. 27, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 3234; R.C. 1899, § 3234; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 10; R.C. 1905, § 4644; C.L. 1913, § 5159; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 6-0331.

6-03-32.
When no bids for purchase of delinquent stock.

If no bidder who will pay to the association the amount due on the stock and the costs and expenses of sale for the transfer of the stock to that person appears at the time and place set for the sale, no sale may be made, and all the shares of the shareholder must be forfeited to the association together with all amounts previously paid thereon. The association forthwith shall cancel such shares upon its books and records and shall deduct the same from its capital stock and immediately shall notify the commissioner in writing of the action taken. The record of the association’s stock book showing the sale or cancellation of stock is prima facie evidence of the regularity of the proceedings of the sale or cancellation.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 9; 1893, ch. 27, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 3234; R.C. 1899, § 3234; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 10; R.C. 1905, § 4644; C.L. 1913, § 5159; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 23; R.C. 1943, § 6-0332.

6-03-33.
Loans on shares prohibited — Disposal of stock acquired.

No association or banking institution may make any loan or discount on the security of the shares of its own stock or of the stock of any holding company which controls the association or banking institution, nor be a purchaser or holder of any such shares, unless such security or purchase is necessary to prevent loss upon a debt previously contracted in good faith. Stock so acquired must be sold or disposed of at public or private sale within thirty days after it is acquired, and if not sold within such time, it must be canceled and deducted from the capital stock of the association, banking institution, or holding company, and the association, banking institution, or holding company shall notify the commissioner in writing of such cancellation. For the purpose of this section, “control” means ownership, or control directly, indirectly, or through the actions of one or more persons of the power to vote twenty-five percent or more of any class of voting securities of the association or banking institution, of the power to control in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the association or banking institution, or to direct the management or policies of the association or banking institution.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 19; 1893, ch. 27, § 19; R.C. 1895, § 3244; R.C. 1899, § 3244; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 20; R.C. 1905, § 4654; C.L. 1913, § 5169; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 24; R.C. 1943, § 6-0333; S.L. 1985, ch. 121, § 1.

6-03-34.
Surplus fund required — Dividends only out of earnings not required for surplus.

The board of directors of any association organized under this title may declare and pay dividends out of the net profits of the association subject to the limitations of this chapter. Every such association, as its board of directors deems advisable, shall ascertain, set apart, and convert into a surplus fund at least fifty percent of its net earnings until such surplus fund equals one hundred percent of its common stock, and no dividend may be declared upon its stock except from the remaining fifty percent of its net earnings.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 13; 1893, ch. 27, § 13; R.C. 1895, § 3238; R.C. 1899, § 3238; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 14; R.C. 1905, § 4648; C.L. 1913, § 5163; S.L. 1927, ch. 97, §§ 1, 2; 1931, ch. 96, § 31, subss. a, b; 1943, ch. 88, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0334; S.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 1; 1987, ch. 106, § 1; 2003, ch. 68, § 1.

6-03-35.
Surplus fund exempt from taxation.

The surplus fund of any association organized under this title, in an amount not exceeding one hundred percent of its capital stock, is exempt from taxation and must not be taken into account in determining the taxable value of the shares of stock of the association.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 97, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 31, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 6-0335.

6-03-36.
Capital must be maintained — Dividends prohibited under certain conditions.

No director or officer of an association may permit the impairment of an association’s capital by the payment of dividends or otherwise.

Except as provided in subsection 4, no dividend may be paid which exceeds the following amount:

An association’s net profits for the period beginning January first of the year for which the proposed dividends are declared and ending as reported in the most recent quarter-end call report; plus

The association’s net profits for the preceding two calendar years as reported in the year-end call report; less

Any required transfers to:

Surplus; and

Funds for the retirement of preferred stock, capital notes, and debentures.

For the purpose of this section, “net profits” means the institution’s net profits after taxes prior to extraordinary items less dividends as reported on the call reports.

Payment of a dividend which exceeds the calculated amount in subsection 2 may be made only with prior approval of the commissioner or state banking board.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 15; 1893, ch. 27, § 15; R.C. 1895, § 3240; R.C. 1899, § 3240; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 16; R.C. 1905, § 4650; C.L. 1913, § 5165; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 32; R.C. 1943, § 6-0336; S.L. 1985, ch. 122, § 1; 1987, ch. 106, § 2; 1991, ch. 81, § 5; 1995, ch. 85, § 2.

Cross-References.

Assessment of civil money penalties, see § 6-01-04.3.

6-03-37.
Reserve funds.

Every banking association shall have on hand at all times in available funds an amount which meets the requirements of the board of governors of the federal reserve system.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 20; 1893, ch. 27, § 20; R.C. 1895, § 3245; R.C. 1899, § 3245; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 21; R.C. 1905, § 4655; C.L. 1913, § 5170; S.L. 1915, ch. 58, § 1; 1919 Sp., ch. 23, § 1; 1925, ch. 95, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5170; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 30; 1937, ch. 96, § 1; 1941, ch. 102, § 1; 1943, ch. 88, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 6-0337; S.L. 1965, ch. 87, § 1; 1969, ch. 106, § 1; 1981, ch. 110, § 3; 2013, ch. 77, § 17.

6-03-37.1.
Bank loans of excess reserves.

Obligations representing loans from one business day to the next to any state-chartered bank or national banking association of excess reserve balances from time to time maintained under the provisions of section 6-03-37, as amended, may not be deemed loans or additions to any loans for the purposes of section 6-03-59.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 106, § 1.

6-03-38.
Assets not to be used in other business — Exceptions — Penalty.

Except as otherwise authorized under this title, a bank may not employ its money or other assets as principal, directly or indirectly, in trade or commerce, nor may a bank employ or invest any of its assets or funds in the stock of any corporation, limited liability company, bank, partnership, firm, or association. However, to the extent a bank subject to the laws of the federal government is permitted to do so, a state bank may purchase shares of stocks, or any other type of securities offered by small business investment companies organized and licensed under Public Law No. 85-699, known as the Small Business Investment Company Act of 1958 [72 Stat. 689; 15 U.S.C. 661 et seq.], and the Small Business Equity Enhancement Act of 1992 [Pub. L. 102-366; 106 Stat. 1007-1020; 15 U.S.C. 661 et seq.], and any amendments thereto, or chapter 10-30, but in no event may any state bank hold securities of small business investment companies in an amount determined by the state banking board, but in no event more than ten percent of the bank’s capital and surplus. A bank may not invest the bank’s assets or funds in speculative margins of stock, bonds, grain, provisions, produce, or other commodities, except that it is lawful for a bank to make advances for grain or other products in store or in transit to market. A bank may invest in subsidiary organizations, when the activities of such organizations are incidental or complementary to the bank’s activities, with the specific approval of the state banking board for each such subsidiary. The state banking board has the same power to make rules for the subsidiary organizations, and to examine the organizations’ records and affairs, as it has for other financial corporations under section 6-01-04. If the state banking board determines that such investments would be detrimental to the interests of a bank’s depositors, the state banking board may direct the bank to divest itself of such subsidiary investments. Any officer, director, or employee of any bank who invests or uses the bank’s funds contrary to this title is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 38; R.C. 1905, § 4672; C.L. 1913, § 5187; S.L. 1915, ch. 54, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5187; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 33; R.C. 1943, § 6-0338; S.L. 1967, ch. 87, § 1; 1969, ch. 107, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 43; 1985, ch. 123, § 1; 1987, ch. 141, § 15; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 72, § 1; 1995, ch. 107, § 1; 2001, ch. 91, § 1; 2005, ch. 83, § 2; 2007, ch. 77, § 3.

Cross-References.

Small Business Investment Act, see 15 USCS 661 et seq.

6-03-39.
Investment in federal reserve bank stock authorized.

A bank shall have authority to invest such part of its funds in stock of the federal reserve bank of this district as may be necessary to permit the bank to become a member of the federal reserve association, and such stock may be carried as a part of the bank’s assets.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 54, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 5187; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 33; R.C. 1943, § 6-0339.

6-03-40.
Investment in capital stock of certain agricultural credit corporations authorized — Limitations. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1947, ch. 108, § 1.

6-03-40.1.
Liquidation of investments in agricultural credit corporations — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 108, § 1.

6-03-41.
Issuance of capital notes or debentures — Not subject to double liability.

With the approval of the commissioner, any banking institution, through action by its board of directors taken at any time and without requiring any action by its stockholders, may issue and sell its capital notes or debentures. All capital notes or debentures are subordinate and subject to the claims of depositors, and at the time of issue may be subordinated and subjected to the claims of other creditors, but in no case may be subject to assessment. The holders of capital notes or debentures as such are not responsible individually for any debts, contracts, or engagements of the issuing institution.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 6-0341.

6-03-42.
Capital notes or debentures included in capital — Retirement.

The term “capital” as used in this title embraces the amount of outstanding capital notes and debentures legally issued by any banking institution. The capital stock of a banking institution is unimpaired when the amount of such capital notes and debentures as represented by sound assets exceeds the impairment as found by the commissioner. The commissioner must approve of any retirement of any capital notes or debentures and may require the bank to issue some other form of capital before retiring the capital notes or debentures.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 6-0342; S.L. 1969, ch. 109, § 1.

6-03-43.
Preferred stock authorized — Notice to and consent of stockholders.

Any banking institution, with the consent of the commissioner and upon the written consent of all of its stockholders, or by vote of its stockholders owning a majority of the stock of such institution, may issue preferred stock of one or more classes in such amount, upon such conditions and limitations and with such par value as shall be approved by the commissioner. When it is necessary to call a meeting of the stockholders to approve the issuance of preferred stock, the board of directors of the institution shall cause notice of the meeting to be served on each stockholder by registered or certified mail addressed to the stockholder’s last-known post-office address at least sixty days prior to the meeting. After an institution has been authorized to issue preferred stock, its board of directors may make necessary amendments to the articles of incorporation of the institution. Notice to and approval by the stockholders of an institution which has not issued common stock is not required before preferred stock may be issued.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 6-0343.

6-03-44.
Preferred stock included in capital — Reduction of common stock.

The preferred stock lawfully issued by a banking institution must be included in determining whether such banking institution has complied with the minimum capital stock requirements provided in this title. Such preferred stock may be used in the capital structure of such institution in the reduction of the common stock or in addition thereto. This section may not be construed as in any manner decreasing the amount of capital required of an institution under the laws of this state.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0344.

6-03-45.
Preferred stock — Rights of holders — Nonassessable.

The holders of preferred stock are entitled to all rights and privileges and are subject to all limitations and restrictions with respect to dividends, voting, conversion rights, control of management, retirement and replacement of stock, rights and preferences in case of liquidation, and such other rights or privileges as may be fixed and provided in the articles of incorporation of the issuing institution. Preferred stock is nonassessable, and the holders thereof individually are not responsible as such holders for any debts, contracts, or engagements of the bank.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0345.

6-03-46.
Exchange of preferred stock for capital notes or debentures.

Any banking institution, after first obtaining the consent and approval of the commissioner, may exchange its preferred stock for its capital notes or debentures.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 92, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 6-0346; S.L. 1969, ch. 110, § 1.

6-03-47.
Investment in loans and obligations secured by federal or state government.

Banks, trust companies, the Bank of North Dakota, building and loan associations, insurance companies, and other organizations in this state whose mortgage lending is regulated by law, or that are duly qualified federal housing administration mortgagees, are authorized to make, buy, or sell any loan, advances of credit, and obligations representing loans and advances of credit that are insured or guaranteed, or where there is a commitment to insure or guarantee, in part or in full, or conditionally, by the United States, its instrumentalities, this state, or its instrumentalities.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 94, § 1; 1937, ch. 103, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 6-0347; S.L. 1947, ch. 113, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0347; S.L. 1969, ch. 111, § 1; 1971, ch. 107, § 1.

6-03-47.1.
Investment in loans secured by federal or state government. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 112, § 1.

6-03-47.2.
Investments of state banks.

In addition to the other powers authorized by law under this title, any state banking association may invest its funds in:

Bonds, notes, or debentures of any corporation that have been rated in one of the four highest rating categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization registered with the securities and exchange commission. In the case of different ratings from different rating organizations, the lower rating applies. If a nationally recognized statistical rating organization has not rated the security, the bank shall determine that the security is the credit equivalent of a security rated in the four highest rating categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization. This includes documentation demonstrating that the issuer of the security has an adequate capacity to meet financial commitments under the security for the projected life of the asset or exposure and the issuer has adequate capacity to meet financial commitments if the risk of default by the obligor is low and the full and timely repayment of principal and interest is expected. The aggregate par value of investments issued by any one corporation may not exceed twenty-five percent of unimpaired capital and surplus at the time of purchase.

Equity and debt instruments of corporations or projects designed primarily to promote community welfare such as economic rehabilitation and development of low-income areas, subject to approval and regulation of the state banking board but not to exceed for the total of all investments under this subsection, ten percent of the combined capital and surplus of the banking association.

Investments, in either equity or debt instruments or securities, offered by small business investment companies organized and licensed by the Small Business Administration under the Small Business Investment Company Act of 1958 [Pub. L. 85-699; 72 Stat. 689; 15 U.S.C. 661 et seq.], and the Small Business Enhancement Act of 1992 [Pub. L. 102-366; 106 Stat. 1007-1020; 15 U.S.C. 661 et seq.], and any amendments thereto.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 68, § 1; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1993, ch. 72, § 2; 1997, ch. 78, § 7; 2015, ch. 80, § 5, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 76, § 9, effective April 13, 2021.

6-03-47.3.
Bank investment in investment company shares.

Financial institutions under the jurisdiction of the state banking board may invest in shares of investment companies registered under the Investment Companies Act of 1940 and which invest only in investments otherwise permitted under this chapter. The state banking board may issue rules and regulations governing investments by North Dakota financial institutions in shares of registered investment companies.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 107, § 1.

6-03-47.4.
Bank investment in federal agricultural mortgage corporation stock.

Financial institutions under the jurisdiction of the state banking board may invest in stock and equity instruments of the federal agricultural mortgage corporation. The state banking board may adopt rules governing investments by North Dakota financial institutions in the stock and equity instruments of the federal agricultural mortgage corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 102, § 1.

6-03-48.
Investment in notes or bonds secured by insured mortgage — Debentures of federal housing administrator authorized.

Banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, the state of North Dakota and its political subdivisions, institutions, and agencies thereof, and all other persons, associations, and corporations subject to the laws of this state may invest the funds and moneys in their custody or possession eligible for investment in notes or bonds secured by mortgage or deed of trust insured by the federal housing administrator, in debentures issued by the federal housing administrator, and in securities issued by national mortgage associations.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 94, § 2; 1937, ch. 103, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 6-0348; S.L. 1983, ch. 319, § 2.

6-03-49.
Federal housing administrator — Insured bonds and notes — Debentures — Security for deposits.

Notes and bonds insured and debentures issued by the federal housing administrator are eligible as collateral to secure the deposit of public or other funds, as deposits with any public official or department, and for investment of capital, surplus, reserve, or other funds where such investment is limited to designated securities.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 103, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0349.

6-03-49.1.
Bank investment in service corporation — Service corporation services and activities.

Subject to the approval of the state banking board, any bank may invest in a service corporation and provide services and activities through the service corporation, if:

The service corporation is a United States corporation and is organized as a bank service corporation having its principal place of business in the United States.

The investment in stocks, bonds, debentures, or other obligations does not exceed ten percent of paid-in and unimpaired capital and unimpaired surplus in each corporation.

The service corporation is operated exclusively for the purpose of providing for such bank and one or more other banks, bank services which the banks would otherwise be required or permitted to provide for on an individual bank basis. The term bank services in this section includes:

Check and deposit sorting and posting.

Computation and posting of interest and other credits and charges.

Preparation and mailing of checks, statements, notices, and similar items.

Any other clerical, bookkeeping, accounting, statistical, or similar functions performed by a bank.

Owning and administering a credit card program for customers of banks.

Engaging in activities incidental to banking services.

Other activities that further or facilitate the corporate purposes of a bank or subsidiaries of a bank, if the services may be lawfully performed by both its national bank shareholders under the laws of the United States and its state bank shareholders under the laws of this state.

Payment for rent earned, goods sold and delivered, or services rendered prior to the making of the payment is not an investment under this subsection. A bank service corporation may not accept deposits.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 98, § 1; 1989, ch. 103, § 1; 1997, ch. 82, § 1; 2021, ch. 76, § 10, effective April 13, 2021.

6-03-50.
Exceptions from restrictive provisions.

No law of this state requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or limiting the making of loans to shareholders or members of the lender, or prescribing the nature, amount or forms of such security, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or investments, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, may be deemed to apply to loans or investments made pursuant to sections 6-03-47, 6-03-48, and 6-03-49.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 94, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 6-0350; S.L. 1947, ch. 113, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 6-0350.

6-03-51.
Borrowing, normal and emergency — Limitations.

Any state banking association has power to borrow money subject to the limitations of this chapter. Money borrowed from correspondent banks must be evidenced by the promissory note or notes of the borrowing association, and no such association may issue its certificate of deposit for money so borrowed or otherwise conceal the true nature of the transaction. Nothing herein affects the right of a state banking association to receive bona fide deposits from banks or other persons.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 2; 1925 Supp., § 5191a2; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 06-0351; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 6-0351.

6-03-52.
Borrowing and rediscounting — Authorization by directors.

No banking association may borrow money, rediscount paper with recourse on it, or pledge securities for money borrowed or rediscounted paper, except in accordance with express authority conferred by resolution of its board of directors indicating the officer or officers who are authorized to borrow, rediscount, and pledge and the extent of their authority. Every such resolution must be entered in the minute book of the association, but a copy of such resolution certified as such by an officer of the association, authenticated by the seal of the association and accepted and acted upon by another bank or other lender in good faith is conclusive evidence of the existence and terms of the resolution.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 5191a5; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34; subs. c; R.C. 1943, § 6-0352; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 6-0352.

6-03-53.
Borrowing and rediscounting — Report required.

Whenever a state banking association borrows money or rediscounts with recourse such association shall immediately make a full written report of the transaction to the commissioner upon the commissioner’s request, which report must include a full description of all collateral security given or to be given by such association for the credit obtained.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 5191a4; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. d; R.C. 1943, § 6-0353; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 6-0353; S.L. 1993, ch. 73, § 1.

6-03-54.
Pledge — Ratio to assets.

It is unlawful for any state banking association to pledge or hypothecate more than one and one-half dollars of the face value of any of its assets for each one dollar of money borrowed, except with written authority from the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 5191a3; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. e; R.C. 1943, § 6-0354; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 6-0354.

6-03-54.1.
Pledges of bank securities to secure repayment of deposits by a federally recognized Indian tribe.

A bank, upon the deposit with it of funds by a federally recognized Indian tribe, or an officer, employee, or agent thereof in that person’s official capacity, may give security for the safekeeping and repayment of the funds deposited by a pledge of securities of the same kind and to the same extent as is authorized by section 21-04-09 in the case of deposits of public funds by public corporations.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 83, § 1.

6-03-55.
Powers of pledgee of bank assets.

Holders of pledged or hypothecated notes or other evidences of indebtedness pledged by state banking associations have the right to collect and enforce payment, and to renew or extend the time of payment thereof for a period not longer than fifteen months, if no endorser, guarantor, or joint maker would be released by such renewal or extension. Such holders also have the right:

To accept from the makers of such pledged or hypothecated notes or other evidences of debt, security, or additional security for the payment thereof.

To execute and give discharges and releases of instruments and securities to the maker upon payment in full thereof.

To sell, assign, and transfer any note with the security pledged therefor.

The pledgee is entitled to be reimbursed from the pledged assets, or from the proceeds of the sale thereof, for the reasonable and necessary expenses incurred and expended in collecting, renewing, securing, and otherwise protecting the assets pledged or hypothecated to the pledgee.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 6; 1925 Supp., § 5191a6; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34; subs. f; R.C. 1943, § 6-0355.

6-03-56.
Unlawful borrowing, rediscounting, endorsing, pledging by officers, employees, and accessories — Penalty.

Any officer, director, agent, or employee of any state banking association who borrows money for, or on behalf or in the name of such association or obligates any such association upon rediscounted paper, or pledges any of the assets of such association in violation of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is personally liable to the association for any loss it sustains on account of such illegal action, but no such violation may affect the validity of any loan, endorsement, or pledge in the hands of any federal reserve bank or federal lending agency or commercial bank correspondent who loaned money to the association or discounted its paper in good faith and in reliance upon a certified copy of a resolution complying with section 6-03-52.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 11; 1925 Supp., § 5191a11; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. i; R.C. 1943, § 6-0356; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 6-0356; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 44.

6-03-57.
Foreclosure of pledge contracts.

Except as otherwise provided in chapter 6-07.2, no pledge made by an association may be foreclosed except by an action in equity brought in the district court of the county in which the pledgor association is located, except where assets are pledged by a state banking association in order to secure borrowed money or the obligation of the association on rediscounted paper, the rights of the pledgee must be determined by the terms of the agreement of pledge, and if the pledged assets are outside of this state, the foreclosure of the pledge is governed by the laws of the state where the pledge is located.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, § 7; 1925 Supp., § 5191a7; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. g1; R.C. 1943, § 6-0357; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 6-0357; S.L. 1991, ch. 87, § 1; 2021, ch. 77, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

6-03-58.
Unlawful rediscounts, borrowings, and pledgings.

It is unlawful for any state banking association, either directly or indirectly, to make any rediscount or contract to borrow money, nor may it borrow money, nor pledge or hypothecate, nor contract to pledge or hypothecate, any of its assets except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1925, ch. 92, §§ 1, 10; 1925 Supp., §§ 5191a1, 5191a10; S.L. 1931, ch. 96, § 34, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 6-0358; S.L. 1949, ch. 105, § 7; 1957 Supp., § 6-0358.

6-03-59.
Loan limitation to one borrower or concern.

The total direct, indirect, or contingent liability of any borrower to any state banking association shall not exceed at any time twenty-five percent of the association’s tier 1 capital as of the most recent report of condition and income. For the purpose of this section, the total liability of a borrower includes the liabilities of any separate borrowers for which the repayment of separate loans or extensions of credit is substantially from the same source and any credit exposure to a borrower arising from a derivative transaction, repurchase agreement, reverse repurchase agreement, securities lending transaction, or securities borrowing transaction between the state banking association and the borrower.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 23, § 22; 1893, ch. 27, § 22; R.C. 1895, § 3247; R.C. 1899, § 3247; S.L. 1905, ch. 165, § 23; R.C. 1905, § 4657; S.L. 1909, ch. 45, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 5172; S.L. 1927, ch. 95, § 1; 1931, ch. 96, § 35; 1943, ch. 88, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 6-0359; S.L. 1961, ch. 108, § 1; 1965, ch. 88, § 1; 1979, ch. 126, § 1; 1985, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 83, § 3; 2011, ch. 76, § 5.

Cross-References.

Assessment of civil money penalties, see § 6-01-04.3.

6-03-59.1.
Leasing of personal property — Limitation on term and amount.

A bank may become the owner and lessor of personal property upon the specific request of and for the use of a customer. The term of the lease may not exceed twenty years and all such leases must provide for the payment of at least annual rentals, the total of which must at least equal the cost to the bank of the personal property so leased. The total leasing obligation or rentals to a bank will be a part of the total liability limitations of any borrower as set forth in section 6-03-59.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 472, § 1; 1973, ch. 69, § 1; 1975, ch. 69, § 1.

Cross-References.
